District of Columbia statutes.
7-1231.13

Retention of civil rights.

Consumers shall be presumed legally competent and retain all civil rights, unless otherwise limited by order of the court. As used in this section, the term “civil rights” shall include, but not be limited to, the rights to:

(1)

Contract;

(2)

Hold a professional, occupational, or motor vehicle driver’s license;

(3)

Marry or enter into a domestic partnership, or obtain a divorce, annulment, or dissolution of marriage or a termination of a domestic partnership in accordance with § 32-702(d), or § 16-904(e).

(4)

Make a will;

(5)

Hold or dispose of property;

(6)

Vote;

(7)

Sue and be sued;

(8)

Serve on a jury; and

(9)

Enjoy all benefits and privileges guaranteed by law.

Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 213, 48 DCR 7674
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 17(b), 55 DCR 6758
Apr. 9, 2016, D.C. Law 21-105, § 4(a), 63 DCR 217
D.C. Law 17-231 rewrote par. (3), which had read as follows: “(3) Marry or obtain a divorce, annulment, or dissolution of marriage;”.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 213 of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).